Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1082.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Legislative findings.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Human trafficking is a clear and present threat to our Commonwealth and our nation.(2) Human trafficking is a form of modern-day slavery that involves the exploitation of individuals through force, fraud or coercion for the purposes of forced labor, sexual exploitation or other forms of involuntary servitude.(3) According to the United States Department of State and the National Human Trafficking Hotline, thousands of cases of human trafficking are reported in the United States each year, with Pennsylvania ranking ninth among the states with the highest number of reported cases and fourth in the 1234567891011121314151617 nation for the number of active criminal human trafficking cases.(4) Increased public awareness and education are essential in the effort to identify, prevent and eliminate human trafficking in all its forms.(5) January is recognized nationally as Human Trafficking Prevention Month, and January 11 is observed across the United States as Human Trafficking Awareness Day.Section 2. Recognition.In accordance with the official day recognized by the Federal Government, January 11 shall be recognized as "Human Trafficking Awareness Day" in this Commonwealth.Section 3. Construction.Nothing in this act shall be construed as requiring an employer to treat "Human Trafficking Awareness Day" as a legal or official holiday or to provide paid leave to an employee on "Human Trafficking Awareness Day" solely by virtue of the date being designated under this act.Section 4. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB1082PN1299 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920